Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.090

Temporary permits.

The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of certificates of competency whenever a plumber coming into the state of Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary permit to engage in the trade of plumbing as a journey level plumber or as a specialty plumber during the period of time between filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW 18.106.030 as now or hereafter amended and taking the examination provided for in RCW 18.106.050. The temporary permit may include a photograph of the plumber. No temporary permit shall be issued to:

(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a certificate of competency;

(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the department with such evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;

(3) Any apprentice plumber.

[ 2013 c 23 s 22; 2009 c 36 s 4; 1985 c 7 s 78; 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.